Idaho statutes. Title 5 PROCEEDINGS IN CIVIL ACTIONS IN COURTS OF RECORD
Chapter 3 PARTIES TO ACTIONS
§ 5-340. Immunity of radio and television broadcasting organizations participating in the Amber Alert and Blue Alert systems.

No cause of action shall be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against any radio or television broadcast organization, or the employees, officers, directors, managers or agents of such radio or television broadcast organization, based on the broadcast of information supplied by state law enforcement officials pursuant to the voluntary broadcast notification system commonly known as the:

“Amber Alert,” which is used to notify the public of missing or abducted children; or

“Blue Alert,” which is used to notify the public pursuant to section 67-2920, Idaho Code.

§ 5-341. Immunity of employers allowing employee firearm storage.

No action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against an employer where the claim arises out of the policy of an employer to either specifically allow or not prohibit the lawful storage of firearms by employees in their personal motor vehicles on the employer’s business premises.

§ 5-342. Immunity for search and rescue operations.

No person serving as a volunteer member of a search and rescue operation constituted pursuant to section 31-2229, Idaho Code, may have their actions or omissions occurring during the search and rescue operation found to be the proximate cause of injuries to a person subject of a search or rescue, unless the volunteer’s actions or omissions are not done in good faith or are grossly negligent. This limitation of liability applies notwithstanding the fact that an organization may recover costs incurred incident to the search and rescue operation or rendering of emergency care.

§ 5-343. Immunity of colleges and universities allowing firearms.

No action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against the board of regents of the university of Idaho, the boards of trustees of the state colleges and universities, a dormitory housing commission, the board for career technical education or the boards of trustees of each of the community colleges established under chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, where the claim arises out of the policy of the board or commission to either specifically allow or not prohibit the lawful possession and storage of firearms on its property.

§ 5-344. Immunity — Aid to person in vehicle.

A person is immune from civil liability for entry, including forced entry and any resulting property damage, into a motor vehicle for the purpose of removing another person from the vehicle, provided that the person entering:

Has a reasonable, good-faith belief that the other person is in imminent danger of suffering death or serious bodily harm;

Contacts law enforcement before and immediately after entering, if feasible; and

Uses no more force than reasonably necessary to gain entry.

This section shall not be construed to provide immunity from civil liability for physical harm caused to the person in the vehicle or for any other action or omission unrelated to the act of entering the vehicle as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

§ 5-345. Immunity for aid during an emergency.

No architect, engineer, or contractor may be held liable for personal injury, wrongful death, property damage, or other loss related to any architectural, structural, electrical, mechanical, construction, design, or other professional service provided by the architect or engineer, voluntarily or without compensation, or the contractor at the request or approval of a national, state, or local public official in response to a declared national, state, or local emergency, a disaster, or a catastrophic event. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to services rendered within ninety (90) days following the end of the declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophic event unless extended by executive order of the governor.

Limited liability under this section shall not apply if the injury, death, or damage is the result of unreasonable acts, gross negligence, or willful or wanton misconduct or if the architect, engineer, or contractor did not act as a reasonable architect, engineer, or contractor would have under the same or similar circumstances.